Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4419
Director; administrative powers.

The director may make use of any of the powers established under Chapter 44 to enforce the laws of this state if those powers are not specifically preempted by the federal Product Liability Risk Retention Act of 1981 as amended by the Risk Retention Amendments of 1986. Such powers shall include, but not be limited to, administrative authority to investigate, issue subpoenas, conduct depositions and hearings, issue orders, and impose penalties. With regard to any investigation, administrative proceedings, or litigation, the director may rely on the procedural law, rules, and regulations of this state. The injunctive authority of the director in regard to risk retention groups shall be restricted by the requirement that any injunction be issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1987, LB 514, § 19.